Hawaii statutes.
§171-83 Costs of, and realization from,
residential leasing. The board of land and natural resources is authorized
to expend from the special land and development fund sufficient moneys to meet
all costs of the planning, development, and subdivision of public lands for
residential leasing, the sale of residential leases and otherwise to effectuate
the purposes of this part, and all realizations from residential leases and the
selling of any improvements purchased from lessees shall be paid into the fund.
[L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-79; HRS §171-83]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next